Utah statutes.
31A-5-203.   Articles and bylaws.

(1)  The articles of incorporation requirements in Section 16-10a-202 apply to the articles of a stock corporation, except that:

(a)  the name of the corporation shall comply with Sections 16-10a-401 and 31A-1-109 and the name of any new or renamed corporation shall include the word "insurance" or a term of equivalent meaning;

(b)  authorized shares shall conform to Subsection 31A-5-305(1) and the capital provided for shall conform to Section 31A-5-211; and

(c)  beginning on July 1, 1988, the purposes of the corporation are limited to those permitted by Section 31A-4-107.

(2)  The articles of incorporation requirements in Section 16-6a-202, except Subsections 16-6a-202(1) (f) and (g), apply to the articles of a mutual except that:

(a)  The name of the corporation shall comply with Sections 16-6a-401 and 31A-1-109 and the name of any new or renamed corporation shall include the words "mutual" and "insurance" or terms of equivalent meaning.

(b)  If any mutual bonds are authorized, they shall comply with Subsection 31A-5-305(2)(a).

(c)  The purposes of the corporation may not include doing a title insurance business, and shall be limited to those purposes permitted by Section 31A-4-107.

(d)  If assessable policies are permitted, the articles shall contain provisions giving assessment liabilities and procedures, including a provision specifying the classes of business on which assessment may be separately levied.

(e)  The articles may specify those classes of persons who may be policyholders, or prescribe the procedure for establishing or removing restrictions on the classes of persons who may be policyholders.  The articles shall also state that each policyholder is a member of the corporation.

(3)  Sections 16-10a-830 and 16-10a-831 apply to stock corporations and Section 16-6a-818 applies to mutuals.  The articles or bylaws shall designate three or more principal offices the principal officers of the corporation shall hold.  The principal offices shall be held by at least three separate natural persons.

(4)  The bylaws of a domestic corporation shall comply with this chapter.  A copy of the bylaws, and any amendments to them, shall be filed with the commissioner within 60 days after their adoption.  Subject to this Subsection (4), Subsections 31A-5-204(2)(c) and (5), Subsection 31A-5-213(4), and Section 16-10a-206 apply to stock corporations and Section 16-6a-206 applies to mutuals.



Amended by Chapter 364, 2008 General Session

